USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn_canonical_LC.dix
<pardef n="/jA__v">


<!-- verbal noun -->
<e><p><l>jAnA</l><r>jAnA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAne</l><r>jAnA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>jAwA_huA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwI_huI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwI_huI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwI_huI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAwI_huI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l>gayA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>





 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_hue</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>

 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>jAwe_rahanA_hE</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>jA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAie</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAie</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAie</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAie</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="jA"><i></i><par n="/jA__v"/></e>
